District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-811.01

Real property tax amnesty.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1052, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 412a
as added Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 104(b), 42 DCR 3684
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 502(d), 48 DCR 334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-811.1.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 2(e) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(d)(2) of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).